build/data/lexicon.aff
##
## This file is part of Tihu.
##
## Tihu is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
## it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
## the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
## (at your option) any later version.
##
## Tihu is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
## but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
## MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
## GNU General Public License for more details.
##
## You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
## along with Tihu.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
##
## Contributor(s):
##    Mostafa Sedaghat Joo (mostafa.sedaghat@gmail.com)
##



## clitics

PFX pa      1
PFX pa      بی_            .            bi



SFX sa      6
SFX sa      م              .            am
SFX sa      ت              .            at
SFX sa      ش              .            aS
SFX sa      مان            .            emAn
SFX sa      تان            .            etAn
SFX sa      شان            .            eSAn


SFX sb      6
SFX sb      یم             .            yam
SFX sb      یت             .            yat
SFX sb      یش             .            yaS
SFX sb      یمان           .            yemAn
SFX sb      یتان           .            yetAn
SFX sb      یشان           .            yeSAn


SFX sc      6
SFX sc      _ام            .            am
SFX sc      _ات            .            at
SFX sc      _اش            .            aS
SFX sc      _مان           .            emAn
SFX sc      _تان           .            etAn
SFX sc      _شان           .            eSAn


SFX sd      3
SFX sd      ها             .            hA
SFX sd      های            *GEN         hAye
SFX sd      هایی           .            hAyi

SFX se      6
SFX se      هایم           .            hAyam
SFX se      هایت           .            hAyat
SFX se      هایش           .            hAyaS
SFX se      هایمان         .            hAyemAn
SFX se      هایتان         .            hAyetAn
SFX se      هایشان         .            hAyeSAn

SFX sf      1
SFX sf      هاست           V            hAst


SFX sg      3
SFX sg      _ها            .            hA
SFX sg      _های           *GEN         hAye
SFX sg      _هایی          .            hAyi


SFX sh      6
SFX sh      _هایم          .            hAyam
SFX sh      _هایت          .            hAyat
SFX sh      _هایش          .            hAyaS
SFX sh      _هایمان        .            hAyemAn
SFX sh      _هایتان        .            hAyetAn
SFX sh      _هایشان        .            hAyeSAn


SFX si      1
SFX si      _هاست          V            hAst


SFX sj      2
SFX sj      ان             .            An
SFX sj      انی            .            Ani


SFX sk      2
SFX sk      _ی             *GEN         ye
SFX sk      ٔ               *GEN         ye


SFX sl      2
SFX sl      ی              .            i
SFX sl      ی              AJ           i


SFX sm      2
SFX sm      _ای            .            ?i
SFX sm      _ای            AJ           ?i


SFX sn      2
SFX sn      یی             .            yi
SFX sn      یی             AJ           yi


SFX so      6
SFX so      م              V            am
SFX so      ی              V            i
SFX so      ست             V            ast
SFX so      یم             V            im
SFX so      ید             V            id
SFX so      ند             V            and


SFX sp      5
SFX sp      _ام            V            am
SFX sp      _ای            V            ?i
SFX sp      _ایم           V            ?im
SFX sp      _اید           V            ?id
SFX sp      _اند           V            and


SFX sq      6
SFX sq      یم             V            yam
SFX sq      یی             V            yi
SFX sq      ست             V            st
SFX sq      ییم            V            yim
SFX sq      یید            V            yid
SFX sq      یند            V            yand


SFX sr      5
SFX sr      م              V            am
SFX sr      ی              V            ie
SFX sr      یم             V            im
SFX sr      ید             V            id
SFX sr      ند             V            and


SFX st      2
SFX st      تر/sdslso             .            tar
SFX st      ترین/sgso           .            tarin


SFX su      2
SFX su      _تر/sdslso            .            tar
SFX su      _ترین/sgso          .            tarin

## Ezafe
SFX sv      1
SFX sv      ی             *GEN          ye
